North Carolina, session 2025, SB35.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act applies to the Northeastern Workforce Development Board
serving Dare, Currituck, Camden, Pasquotank, Perquimans, Chowan, Gates, Hyde, Tyrrell, and
Washington Counties only.
SECTION 2. G.S. 143B-438.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-438.11. Local Workforce Development Boards.
(a) Duties. – Local Workforce Development Boards shall have the following powers and
duties:
…
(7a) To designate through a competitive selection process, designate, by no later
than July 1, 2014, and annually thereafter, the providers of adult and
dislocated worker services authorized in the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act.
…."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S35-v-1*